West Virginia, session 2025, SB61.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: CHAPTER 5.  GENERAL POWERS AND AUTHORITY OF THE GOVERNOR, SECRETARY OF STATE AND ATTORNEY GENERAL; BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS; MISCELLANEOUS AGENCIES, COMMISSIONS, OFFICES, PROGRAMS, ETC. ARTICLE 10. WEST VIRGINIA PUBLIC EMPLOYEES RETIREMENT ACT. §5-10-22o. Cost-of-living adjustments for certain annuitants effective on or before June 30, 2025. (a) As an additional cost-of-living adjustment to other retirement allowances provided, a cost-of-living adjustment to retirement benefits shall be paid to retirees of the system as provided in subsection (b) of this section. The cost-of-living adjustment shall equal $1,000 and the first payment shall be paid in full by June 30, 2025.(b) The cost-of-living adjustment provided by this section applies to any retiree who currently receives an annual retirement annuity. This cost-of-living adjustment is subject to any applicable limitations under section 415 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.(c) The cost-of-living adjustment provided by this section is payable pro rata to any beneficiary of a qualifying retiree who currently receives an annuity or other benefit payable by the system. CHAPTER 18.  EDUCATION. ARTICLE 7A.  STATE TEACHERS RETIREMENT SYSTEM. §18-7A-26z. Cost-of-living adjustments for certain annuitants effective on or before June 30, 2025. (a) As an additional cost-of-living adjustment to other retirement allowances provided, a cost-of-living adjustment to retirement benefits shall be paid to certain retirees of the retirement system as provided in subsection (b) of this section. The cost-of-living adjustment shall equal $1,000 and shall be paid in full by June 30, 2025.(b) The cost-of-living adjustment provided in this section applies to any retiree who currently receives an annual retirement annuity. This cost-of-living adjustment is subject to any applicable limitations under Section 415 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.(c) The cost-of-living adjustment provided by this section is payable pro rata to any beneficiary of a qualifying retiree who currently receives an annuity or other benefit payable by the retirement system.